Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-508
Rules
and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out the Food Supply Animal Veterinary Incentive
Program Act.

Laws 2008,
LB1172, § 8.